Illinois, session 104th, SB4144.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4ARTICLE 15    Section 1. The following named amounts, or so much thereof 6as may be necessary, respectively, are appropriated for the 7ordinary and contingent expenses of the Office of the State 8Fire Marshal, as follows:9GENERAL OFFICE10Payable from the Fire Prevention Fund:11  For Personal Services............................19,416,00012  For State Contributions to the State13   Employees' Retirement System.....................8,437,40014  For State Contributions to Social Security........1,321,50015  For Group Insurance...............................5,456,00016  For Contractual Services..........................1,400,00017  For Travel..........................................335,00018  For Commodities.....................................341,00019  For Printing.........................................32,00020  For Equipment.....................................1,070,00021  For Electronic Data Processing....................3,180,00022  For Telecommunication Services......................265,00023  For Operation of Auto Equipment.....................701,000  SB4144- 2 -OMB104 00279 STV 10279 b1  For Refunds...........................................5,0002    Total                                         $41,959,9003Payable from the Underground Storage Tank Fund:4  For Personal Services.............................2,988,6005  For State Contributions to the State6   Employees' Retirement System.....................1,298,7007  For State Contributions to Social Security..........228,7008  For Group Insurance.................................950,4009  For Contractual Services............................231,80010  For Travel............................................8,30011  For Commodities.......................................9,00012  For Printing..........................................3,50013  For Equipment.....................................1,050,00014  For Electronic Data Processing.......................10,50015  For Telecommunication Services.......................25,00016  For Operation of Auto Equipment.....................170,00017  For Refunds...........................................4,00018    Total                                          $6,978,500 19    Section 5. The sum of $821,690, or so much thereof as may 20be necessary and remains unexpended at the close of business 21on June 30, 2026, from a reappropriation heretofore made for 22such purpose in Article 106, Section 5 of Public Act 104-0003, 23as amended, is reappropriated from the Fire Prevention Fund to 24the Office of the State Fire Marshal for Equipment.   SB4144- 3 -OMB104 00279 STV 10279 b1    Section 10. The sum of $100,000, or so much thereof as may 2be necessary, is appropriated from the Fire Prevention Fund to 3the Office of the State Fire Marshal for costs and expenses 4related to or in support of the Fire Explorer and Cadet School. 5    Section 15. The sum of $6,000,000, or so much thereof as 6may be necessary, is appropriated from the Fire Prevention 7Fund to the Office of the State Fire Marshal for grants for the 8Small Equipment Grant Program. 9    Section 20. The sum of $1,000,000, or so much thereof as 10may be necessary, is appropriated from the Fire Prevention 11Fund to the Office of the State Fire Marshal for all costs 12associated with the Minimum Basic Firefighter Training 13Program. 14    Section 25. The sum of $75,000, or so much thereof as may 15be necessary, is appropriated from the Fire Prevention Fund to 16the Office of the State Fire Marshal for all costs associated 17with the Illinois Firefighter Peer Support Program. 18    Section 30. The sum of $170,000, or so much thereof as may 19be necessary, is appropriated from the Fire Prevention Fund to 20the Office of the State Fire Marshal for all costs associated 21with the Community Risk Reduction Program.   SB4144- 4 -OMB104 00279 STV 10279 b1    Section 35. The sum of $380,000, or so much thereof as may 2be necessary, is appropriated from the Fire Prevention Fund to 3the Office of the State Fire Marshal for all costs associated 4with the Firefighter Online Training Management System. 5    Section 40. The sum of $526,809, or so much thereof as may 6be necessary and remains unexpended at the close of business 7on June 30, 2026, from a reappropriation heretofore made for 8such purpose in Article 106, Section 40 of Public Act 9104-0003, as amended, is reappropriated from the Fire 10Prevention Fund to the Office of the State Fire Marshal for all 11costs associated with the renovation and rehabilitation of the 12Fire Museum Building located on the State Fairgrounds in 13Springfield. 14    Section 45. The sum of $75,000, or so much thereof as may 15be necessary, is appropriated from the Illinois Fire Fighters' 16Memorial Fund to the Office of the State Fire Marshal for 17expenses related to the Maintenance and Rehabilitation of the 18Fire Museum Building and Museum Artifacts. 19    Section 50. The sum of $300,000, or so much thereof as may 20be necessary, is appropriated from the Illinois Fire Fighters' 21Memorial Fund to the Office of the State Fire Marshal for all 22costs associated with the Medal of Honor Ceremony, 23Scholarships, and Firefighter Memorial Maintenance.   SB4144- 5 -OMB104 00279 STV 10279 b1    Section 55. The following named amounts, or so much 2thereof as may be necessary, respectively, are appropriated to 3the Office of the State Fire Marshal as follows:4Payable from the Fire Prevention Fund:5  For Expenses of Senior Officer Training..............55,0006  For Expenses of the Cornerstone Program.............500,0007  For Expenses related to Fire Fighter training8   Programs...........................................250,0009  For Expenses of Online Firefighter10   Certification Testing..............................590,00011  For Expenses of the Leadership Development and12   Decision Making Program...........................160,000 13Payable from the Fire Prevention Division Fund:14  For Expenses of the U.S. Resource15   Conservation and Recovery Act16   Underground Storage Tank Program.................1,000,00017    Total                                          $2,555,000 18    Section 60. The following named amounts, or so much 19thereof as may be necessary, respectively, are appropriated 20for the ordinary and contingent expenses of the Office of the 21State Fire Marshal, as follows:22GRANTS23Payable from the Fire Prevention Fund:24  For Chicago Fire Department Training Program......5,360,500  SB4144- 6 -OMB104 00279 STV 10279 b1  For payment to local governmental agencies or individuals2   that participate in the State Training3   Programs.........................................1,450,0004    Total                                          $6,810,500 5    Section 65. The sum of $500, or so much thereof as may be 6necessary, is appropriated from the Fire Prevention Fund to 7the Office of the State Fire Marshal for grants available for 8the development of new fire districts. 9    Section 70. The sum of $350,000, or so much thereof as may 10be necessary, is appropriated from the Fire Prevention Fund to 11the Office of the State Fire Marshal for grants available for 12costs and services related to ILEAS/MABAS operations. 13    Section 75. The sum of $10,000, or so much thereof as may 14be necessary, is appropriated from the Fire Prevention Fund to 15the Office of the State Fire Marshal for a grant to the 16Hazardous Materials Emergency Response Reimbursement. 17    Section 80. The sum of $550,000, or so much thereof as may 18be necessary, is appropriated from the Underground Storage 19Tank Fund to the Office of the State Fire Marshal for a grant 20to the City of Chicago for administrative costs incurred as a 21result of the State's Underground Storage Tank Program.   SB4144- 7 -OMB104 00279 STV 10279 b1    Section 85. The sum of $500,000, or so much thereof as may 2be necessary, is appropriated from the Fire Prevention Fund to 3the Office of the State Fire Marshal for a grant to the 4Illinois Fire Service Institute for costs associated with 5cancer screenings and exposure testing of Illinois 6firefighters. 7    Section 90. The sum of $250,000, or so much thereof as may 8be necessary, is appropriated from the Fire Prevention Fund to 9the Office of the State Fire Marshal for a grant to the 10Illinois Fire Service Institute for research activities. 11    Section 95. The sum of $2,541,521, or so much thereof as 12may be necessary and remains unexpended at the close of 13business on June 30, 2026, from a reappropriation heretofore 14made for such purpose in Article 106, Section 95 of Public Act 15104-0003, as amended, is reappropriated from the Fire 16Prevention Fund to the Office of the State Fire Marshal for the 17Fire Station Rehabilitation and Construction Grant Program. 18    Section 100. The sum of $50,000, or so much thereof as may 19be necessary, is appropriated from the Fire Prevention Fund to 20the Office of the State Fire Marshal for all costs associated 21with Diversity, Equity, Inclusion, and Accessibility outreach 22activities.   SB4144- 8 -OMB104 00279 STV 10279 b1    Section 105. The sum of $5,500,000, or so much thereof as 2may be necessary, is appropriated from the Fire Prevention 3Fund to the Office of the State Fire Marshal for the Fire 4Station Rehabilitation and Construction Grant Program. 5    Section 110. The sum of $22,800, or so much thereof as may 6be necessary, is appropriated from the Fire Prevention Fund to 7the Office of the State Fire Marshal for a grant to the 8Illinois Fire Inspectors Association to provide Fire 9Inspection Basics training courses. 10    Section 999. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 112026.